Rhode Island, session 2026, SB2493.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 31-27-4 of the General Laws in Chapter 31-27 entitled "Motor
Vehicle Offenses" is hereby amended to read as follows:
31-27-4. Reckless driving and other offenses against public safety.
Any person who operates a motor vehicle recklessly so that the lives or safety of the public
might be endangered, or operates a vehicle in an attempt to elude or flee from a traffic officer or
police vehicle, or who commits one or more moving violations while traveling at least twenty-five
miles per hour (25 mph) shall be guilty of a misdemeanor for the first conviction and a felony for
the second and each subsequent conviction a felony and shall be imprisoned for not more than five
(5) years and fined not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000), nor more than five thousand dollars
($5,000).
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC004510
========